Hawaii statutes.
[§342H-36.5] Leaf blower debris.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to use or
operate a leaf blower in such a manner as to
blow, dispel, or make airborne dust, leaves, grass cuttings, paper, trash, or
any other type of unattached debris or material, beyond the boundaries of the
parcel of property being cleaned, unless the consent of the adjoining owner or
person in possession of the adjoining property is obtained.

(b) It shall be unlawful
for any person to use or operate a leaf blower in such a way as to blow leaves,
dirt, and other debris onto the public rights-of-way or onto private property
not owned, leased, or controlled by the leaf blower operator or the employer or
contractor of the leaf blower operator and to allow the debris to remain there
in excess of thirty minutes.

(c) For purposes of this
section:

"Leaf blower"
shall have the same meaning as defined in section 342F-30.8.

"Parcel" means a legal lot of
record. Contiguous parcels owned by the same individual or entity shall be
considered one parcel for purposes of this section. [L 2010, c 206, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next